Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 4. Exempt Property and Allowances.

Sec. 13.12.401.
Applicable law.

Except as provided in AS

13.06.068

, AS

13.12.401

—

13.12.405

apply to the estate of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state, and rights to homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance for a decedent who dies not domiciled in this state are governed by the law of the decedent’s domicile at death.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.12.402.
Homestead allowance.

A decedent’s surviving spouse is entitled to a homestead allowance of $27,000. If there is no surviving spouse, each minor child and each dependent child of the decedent is entitled to a homestead allowance amounting to $27,000 divided by the number of minor and dependent children of the decedent. The homestead allowance is exempt from and has priority over all claims against the estate. Homestead allowance is in addition to a share passing to the surviving spouse or minor or dependent child by the will of the decedent, unless otherwise provided, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.403.
Exempt property.

In addition to the homestead allowance, the decedent’s surviving spouse is entitled from the estate to a value, not exceeding $10,000 in excess of security interests in the items, in household furniture, automobiles, furnishings, appliances, and personal effects. If there is no surviving spouse, the decedent’s children are entitled jointly to the same value. If encumbered chattels are selected and the value in excess of security interests, plus that of other exempt property, is less than $10,000, or if there is not $10,000 worth of exempt property in the estate, the spouse or children are entitled to other assets of the estate, if any, to the extent necessary to make up the $10,000 value. Rights to exempt property and assets needed to make up a deficiency of exempt property have priority over all claims against the estate, but the right to assets to make up a deficiency of exempt property abates as necessary to permit earlier payment of homestead allowance and family allowance. These rights are in addition to a benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse or children by the decedent’s will, unless otherwise provided, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.404.
Family allowance.

In addition to the right to homestead allowance and exempt property, the decedent’s surviving spouse and minor children whom the decedent was obligated to support and children who were in fact being supported by the decedent are entitled to a reasonable allowance in money out of the estate for their maintenance during the period of administration. The allowance may not continue for longer than one year if the estate is inadequate to discharge allowed claims. The allowance may be paid as a lump sum or in periodic installments. It is payable to the surviving spouse, if living, for the use of the surviving spouse and minor and dependent children; otherwise it is payable to the children, or persons having their care and custody. If a minor child or dependent child is not living with the surviving spouse, the allowance may be made partially to the child or the child’s guardian or other person having the child’s care and custody, and partially to the spouse, as their needs may appear. The family allowance is exempt from and has priority over all claims except the homestead allowance.

The family allowance is not chargeable against a benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse or children by the will of the decedent, unless otherwise provided, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share. The death of a person entitled to family allowance terminates the right to allowances not yet paid.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.405.
Source, determination, and documentation.

If the estate is otherwise sufficient, property specifically devised may not be used to satisfy rights to homestead allowance or exempt property. Subject to this restriction, the surviving spouse, guardians of minor children, or children who are adults may select property of the estate as homestead allowance and exempt property. The personal representative may make those selections if the surviving spouse, the children, or the guardians of the minor children are unable or fail to do so within a reasonable time or there is no guardian of a minor child. The personal representative may execute an instrument or deed of distribution to establish the ownership of property taken as homestead allowance or exempt property. The personal representative may determine the family allowance in a lump sum not exceeding $18,000 or periodic installments not exceeding $1,500 per month for one year, and may disburse funds of the estate in payment of the family allowance and any part of the homestead allowance payable in cash. The personal representative or an interested person aggrieved by a selection, determination, payment, proposed payment, or failure to act under this section may petition the court for appropriate relief, which may include a family allowance other than that which the personal representative determined or could have determined.

If the right to an elective share is exercised on behalf of a surviving spouse who is an incapacitated person, the personal representative may add unexpended portions payable under the homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance to the trust established under AS

13.12.212(b)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)